Massachusetts, session 194th, H4554.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
1 SECTION 1. Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
2 section 10Z the following section:
3 Section 10AA. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall, unless the
4 context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
5 (1) "Iatrogenic infertility", in impairment of fertility by surgery, radiation, chemotherapy,
6 or other medical treatment affecting reproductive organs or processes, including without
7 limitation treatment for sickle cell disease.
8 (2) "Physician", an individual licensed to practice under section 2 of chapter 112.
9 (3) "Qualified enrollee", an individual who:
10 (A) is enrolled in the MassHealth program pursuant to section 9;
11 (B) has been diagnosed with a form of cancer or other disease by a physician;
1 of 24

12 (C) needs treatment for that cancer or other disease that may cause substantial risk of
13 sterility or iatrogenic infertility, including surgery, radiation, or chemotherapy; and
14 (D) has a primary illness that has impaired the patient’s fertility and ability to reproduce
15 normally.
16 (4) "Standard Fertility Preservation Services", procedures based upon current evidence-
17 based standards of care established by the American Society for Reproductive Medicine, the
18 American Society of Clinical Oncology, or other national medical associations that follow
19 current evidence-based standards of care, and includes the retrieval and storage of two complete
20 oocyte cycles and the collection and storage of two sperm samples.
21 (b)(1) Before January 1, 2024, the division of medical assistance shall apply for a
22 Medicaid waiver or a state plan amendment with the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services
23 of the United States Department of Health and Human Services to implement the coverage
24 described in subsection (b).
25 (2) If the waiver or state plan amendment described in subsection (a) is approved,
26 MassHealth shall provide coverage to a qualified enrollee for standard fertility preservation
27 services.
28 (c) Before November 1, 2025, and before November 1 of each third year after 2025, the
29 division of medical assistance shall calculate the change in state spending attributable to the
30 coverage described in subsection (b)(2), and report this amount to house and senate committees
31 on ways and means
32 Commercial Insurance Coverage for Fertility Preservation Services
2 of 24

33 SECTION 2. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, any policy,
34 contract or certificate of health insurance subject to chapters 32A, 176A, 176B, 176G, 176I, 176J
35 or 176Q of the General Laws, or any blanket or general policy of insurance described in
36 subdivision (A), (C), or (D) of section one hundred and ten which is issued or subsequently
37 renewed by agreement between the insurer and the policyholder, within or without the
38 commonwealth, during the period within which this premium is effective, or any policy of
39 accident or sickness insurance as described in section one hundred and eight which provides
40 hospital expense and surgical expense insurance and which is delivered or issued for delivery or
41 subsequently renewed by agreement between the insurer and the policyholder in the
42 commonwealth, during the period within which this provision is effective, or any employers'
43 health and welfare fund which provides hospital expense and surgical expense benefits and
44 which is issued or renewed to any person or group of persons in the commonwealth, during the
45 period within which this provision is effective, must provide coverage for medically necessary
46 expenses for standard fertility preservation services when a necessary medical treatment may
47 directly or indirectly cause iatrogenic infertility to an enrollee.
48 (b) In determining coverage pursuant to this section, an insurer shall not discriminate
49 based on an individual's expected length of life, present or predicted disability, degree of medical
50 dependency, quality of life, or other health conditions, nor based on personal characteristics,
51 including age, sex, sexual orientation, or marital status.
52 (c) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall, unless the context clearly
53 requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
3 of 24

54 “Iatrogenic infertility”, in impairment of fertility by surgery, radiation, chemotherapy, or
55 other medical treatment affecting reproductive organs or processes, including without limitation
56 treatment for sickle cell disease.
57 “May directly or indirectly cause”, the likely possibility that treatment will cause a side
58 effect of infertility, based upon current evidence-based standards of care established by the
59 American Society for Reproductive Medicine, the American Society of Clinical Oncology, or
60 other national medical associations that follow current evidence-based standards of care.
61 “Standard fertility preservation services”, procedures based upon current evidence-based
62 standards of care established by the American Society for Reproductive Medicine, the American
63 Society of Clinical Oncology, or other national medical associations that follow current
64 evidence-based standards of care, and includes the retrieval and storage of two complete oocyte
65 cycles and the collection and storage of two sperm samples.
66 STATEWIDE SCD STEERING COMMITTEE
67 SECTION 3. (a)(1) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there is
68 hereby established a Statewide Steering Committee on Sickle Cell Disease within the department
69 of public health.
70 (2) The Steering Committee under this section shall consist of:
71 (A) two representatives from the Massachusetts Sickle Cell Disease Association
72 including the Executive Director or their designee;
73 (B) three medical professionals from major Sickle Cell Disease treatment centers in the
74 commonwealth who shall be appointed by the commissioner;
4 of 24

75 (C) the Executive Director of the Massachusetts Association of Community Health
76 Workers or their designee;
77 (D) the President of the Massachusetts Chapter of the National Association of Social
78 Workers or their designee;
79 (E) two members who shall be appointed by the commissioner, one of whom shall be an
80 expert on the biology of the disease, and one of whom shall be an expert on the psycho-social
81 aspect of the disease;
82 (F) two representatives of the department of elementary and secondary education who
83 shall be appointed by the commissioner, including one of whom is knowledgeable about the right
84 to comparable education, supportive services and accommodations under section 504 of the
85 Rehabilitation Act of 1973;
86 (G) one representative of the Black and Latino Caucus who shall be appointed by the
87 commissioner;
88 (H) one representative of the Asian Caucus who shall be appointed by the commissioner;
89 (I) two sickle cell disease patients who shall be appointed by the Governor, one of which
90 shall be over 25 years in age and the other shall be between 18 and 25 years in age;
91 (J) a parent of a minor child with sickle cell disease who shall be appointed by the
92 Governor;
93 (K) a parent of a secondary or post-secondary school age youth with sickle cell disease
94 who shall be appointed by the commissioner; and
5 of 24

95 (L) one representative who has a background in racial health disparities who shall be
96 appointed by the Governor.
97 The representatives of nongovernmental organizations shall serve staggered 3–year
98 terms. Vacancies of unexpired terms shall be filled within 60 days by the appropriate appointing
99 authority.
100 (3) The Steering Committee under this section shall:
101 (A) establish institution and community partnerships, including hospitals, and institutions
102 of higher education;
103 (B) establish a statewide network of stakeholders, including parents, home health care
104 providers, school-based nurses, and the Massachusetts Sickle Cell Disease Association who are
105 committed to care for individuals with sickle cell disease collaboratively in an inclusive setting;
106 (C) establish a statewide network of racially and culturally competent stakeholders who
107 include general and special education administrators and teachers and paraprofessionals;
108 (D) oversee the development of educational materials for individuals with sickle cell
109 disease, the public, and health care providers about the assistance available to such individuals in
110 the commonwealth, including local school district responsibilities for care of such individuals;
111 (E) identify funding sources for implementing or supporting the actions, studies, policies
112 required by federal and state laws and regulations, or recommended by the Steering Committee,
113 including funding from:
114 (i) state, federal, and local government sources; and
6 of 24

115 (ii) private sources;
116 (F) investigate and report on a standard of basic, multidisciplinary care for patients across
117 the commonwealth; and
118 (G) establish subcommittees as appropriate.
119 (4) The department may, in consultation with the Statewide Steering Committee, provide
120 services relating to sickle cell disease, including:
121 (A) educational programs on sickle cell disease for individuals affected by the disease,
122 including:
123 (i) education on the rights of individuals with sickle cell disease, such as, without
124 limitation, the right not to be discriminated against and the right to receive appropriate
125 educational programming, health related services and accommodations necessary to access such
126 programming and services;
127 (ii) expectations, options, and responsibilities of families of individuals with sickle cell
128 disease;
129 (iii) challenges and responsibilities of caregivers of individuals with sickle cell disease;
130 (iv) obligations of employees at primary and secondary schools; and
131 (v) challenges and responsibilities of health care providers;
132 (B) social services support to individuals with sickle cell disease, including support from
133 social workers and community health workers to provide information on services that may be
134 available to the individual;
7 of 24

135 (C) hemoglobin electrophoresis or genetic testing for the presence of sickle cell disease;
136 (D) genetic counseling;
137 (E) assistance with any available reimbursement for medical expenses related to sickle
138 cell disease;
139 (F) education and counseling services for parents and other family members and
140 caretakers after the receipt of sickle cell trait test results from the Newborn Screening Program as
141 required by section 270.006(A)(2)(e) of chapter 105, Code of Massachusetts Regulations,
142 provided that, with the consent of parents and other family members and caretakers, such
143 services may be provided in whole or in part by the Massachusetts Sickle Cell Disease
144 Association; and
145 (G) any other programs or services that are necessary to decrease the use of acute care
146 services by individuals who have sickle cell disease.
147 (5) The department shall, in consultation with any other agency of the commonwealth as
148 the department determines appropriate, provide the services in paragraph (4) through
149 community–based organizations, including specifically, pre-K, elementary and secondary
150 schools as well as institutions for higher education for all affected school-age children, youth,
151 and older students to the extent practicable.
152 (6) The Steering Committee, in conjunction with the department and other relevant
153 stakeholders, shall study and make recommendations on:
154 (A) how to enhance access to services for individuals with sickle cell disease with a focus
155 on areas in the commonwealth where there is a statistically high number of individuals with
8 of 24

156 sickle cell disease or in areas where there is a lack of providers with expertise in treating sickle
157 cell disease;
158 (B) whether to establish a sickle cell disease registry, and if recommended, the process
159 and guidelines for establishing a registry and obtaining information consistent with informed
160 consent and protecting data privacy;
161 (C) how to enhance the coordination of health care services for individuals with sickle
162 cell disease who are transitioning from pediatric to adult health care, including the identification
163 of available resources for individuals who are transitioning; and
164 (D) how to engage with community–based health fairs and other community–sponsored
165 events in areas with a statistically high number of individuals with sickle cell disease to provide
166 outreach and education on living with sickle cell disease and how to access health care services.
167 (b) The department shall, in consultation with the Steering Committee, establish and
168 implement a system the provides information on the sickle cell trait to any individual who has
169 the sickle cell trait and, if the individual is a minor, to the individual’s family.
170 (c) The department shall include the following in the information provided under
171 subsection (b):
172 (1) how the sickle cell trait impacts the health of an individual with the trait;
173 (2) how the sickle cell trait is passed from a parent to a child; and
174 (3) implications for pregnancy.
9 of 24

175 (d) The department shall maintain in a conspicuous location on its website a list of
176 resources for health care practitioners to use to improve their understanding and clinical
177 treatment of individuals with sickle cell disease or the sickle cell trait, including information on
178 the health impacts of carrying the sickle cell trait.
179 (e) For the purposes of this section, the following word shall, unless the context clearly
180 requires otherwise, have the following meaning:-
181 “Steering Committee”, the Statewide Steering Committee on Sickle Cell Disease.
182 SICKLE CELL DISEASE DETECTION AND EDUCATION PROGRAM (ADULT
183 SCREENING AND EDUCATION- RELATED GRANTS)
184 SECTION 4. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there is
185 hereby established within the department of public health the sickle cell disease detection and
186 education program to: (1) promote screening and detection of sickle cell disease, especially
187 among unserved or underserved populations; (2) educate the public regarding sickle cell disease
188 and the benefits of early detection; and (3) provide counseling and referral services.
189 (b) The program under this section shall include:
190 (1) establishment of a statewide public education and outreach campaign to publicize
191 evidence-based sickle cell disease screening, detection and education services. The campaign
192 shall include: general community education, outreach to specific underserved populations,
193 evidence based clinical sickle cell disease screening services, and an informational summary that
194 shall include an explanation of the importance of clinical examinations and what to expect during
195 clinical examinations and sickle cell disease screening services;
10 of 24

196 (2) provision of grants to approved organizations pursuant to subsection (c) and for
197 community based organizations pursuant to subsection (d);
198 (3) compilation of data concerning the program and dissemination of such data to the
199 public; and
200 (4) development of health care professional education programs including the benefits of
201 early detection of sickle cell disease and clinical examinations, the recommended frequency of
202 clinical examinations and sickle cell disease screening services, and professionally recognized
203 best practices guidelines.
204 (c)(1) Under the program, the commissioner of public health shall make grants in
205 amounts appropriated to approved organizations for the provision of services relating to the
206 evidence-based screening and detection of sickle cell disease as part of this program. The
207 services required to be provided under such grants shall include:
208 (A) promotion and provision of early detection of sickle cell disease, including clinical
209 examinations and sickle cell disease screening services;
210 (B) provision of counseling and information on treatment options and referral for
211 appropriate medical treatment;
212 (C) dissemination of information to unserved and underserved populations as determined
213 by the commissioner, to the general public and to health care professionals concerning sickle cell
214 disease, the benefits of early detection and treatment, and the availability of sickle cell disease
215 screening services at no cost to such populations;
11 of 24

216 (D) identification of local sickle cell disease screening services within the approved
217 organization's region;
218 (E) provision of information, counseling and referral services to individuals diagnosed
219 with sickle cell disease; and
220 (F) provision of information regarding the availability of medical assistance, including
221 medical assistance for an individual who is eligible for such assistance pursuant to section 9 of
222 chapter 118E of the General Laws, to an individual who requires treatment for sickle cell
223 disease.
224 (2) The commissioner shall give notice and provide opportunity to submit applications
225 for grants under the program. In order to be considered for a grant, an applicant must show
226 evidence of the following, relating to the services the applicant proposes to provide:
227 (A) ability to provide and to ensure consistent and quality services under the program;
228 (B) expertise in providing the service;
229 (C) capacity to coordinate services with physicians, hospitals and other appropriate local
230 institutions or agencies;
231 (D) ability to provide the service to unserved or underserved populations; and
232 (E) ability to provide the service in accordance with the standards specified in
233 subdivision three of this section.
234 Applications shall be made on forms provided by the commissioner.
12 of 24

235 (3) The commissioner shall develop standards for the implementation of grants under the
236 program by approved organizations, which shall ensure the following:
237 (A) integration of the approved organization with existing health care providers;
238 (B) maximizing third party reimbursement; and
239 (C) provision of services to unserved or underserved populations.
240 (4) Within the amounts of state or federal funds appropriated for the program, approved
241 organizations may be authorized by the department to provide such services for populations
242 served under this title. Services may include evidence based screening, patient education,
243 counseling, follow-up and referral.
244 (5) Every organization receiving grants under this subsection shall submit to the
245 commissioner, on or before October first of each year, a report of such organization's activities,
246 including an assessment of the organization's programs and such data as the commissioner deems
247 relevant and necessary to accomplish the purposes of the program
248 (d)(1) Under the program, the commissioner shall make grants within amounts
249 appropriated for community based organizations to provide post-diagnosis counseling, education
250 and outreach programs for persons diagnosed with sickle cell disease based upon criteria to be
251 developed by the commissioner.
252 (2) The commissioner shall provide notice and opportunity for community-based
253 organizations to submit applications to provide post-diagnosis sickle cell disease counseling,
254 education and outreach programs. Such applications shall be on forms established by the
255 commissioner.
13 of 24

256 (e) The commissioner shall submit, on or before December first of each year, an annual
257 report to the governor and the legislature concerning the operation of the program. The reports
258 shall include the experience of the program in providing services under this act. The annual
259 report shall include strategies for implementation of the sickle cell disease awareness program
260 and for promoting the awareness program to the general public, state and local elected officials,
261 and various public and private organizations, associations, businesses, industries, and agencies.
262 Organizations receiving grants under this act shall provide data and assessments as the
263 commissioner may require for the report. The report shall include any recommendations for
264 additional action to respond to the incidence of sickle cell disease in the commonwealth.
265 (f) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall, unless the context clearly
266 requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
267 “Community-based organizations”, free-standing organizations in which sickle cell
268 disease survivors hold significant decision-making responsibility, and which offer a broad range
269 of sickle cell disease education and support services free of charge.
270 “Program”, sickle cell disease detection and education program.
271 “Unserved or underserved populations", people having inadequate access and financial
272 resources to obtain sickle cell disease screening and detection services, including people who
273 lack health coverage or whose health coverage is inadequate or who cannot meet the financial
274 requirements of their coverage for accessing detection services.
275 SCD REGISTRY AND REPORTS- COMPREHENSIVE DATA COLLECTION ON
276 PEOPLE LIVING WITH SCD OR ITS VARIANTS
14 of 24

277 SECTION 5. (a)(1) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
278 commissioner of public health or designee shall, in accordance with regulations adopted by the
279 department of public health pursuant to subsection (b), and in consultation with the
280 Massachusetts Sickle Cell Disease Association, establish and maintain a system for the reporting
281 of information on sickle cell disease and its variants. Said system shall include a record of the
282 cases of sickle cell disease and its variants which occur in the commonwealth along with such
283 information concerning the cases as may be appropriate to form the basis for: (A) conducting
284 comprehensive epidemiologic surveys of sickle cell disease and its variants in the
285 commonwealth; and (B) evaluating the appropriateness of measures for the treatment of sickle
286 cell disease and its variants.
287 (2) Hospitals, medical laboratories, and other facilities that provide screening, diagnostic
288 or therapeutic services to patients with respect to sickle cell disease and its variants shall report
289 the information prescribed by the regulation promulgated pursuant to subsection (b).
290 (3) Any provider of health care who diagnoses or provides treatment for sickle cell
291 disease and its variants, except for cases directly referred to the provider or cases that have been
292 previously admitted to a hospital, medical laboratory or other facility described in paragraph (2),
293 shall report the information prescribed by the regulation adopted pursuant to subsection (b).
294 (b) The department of public health shall, by regulation:
295 (1) prescribe the form and manner in which information on cases of sickle cell disease
296 and its variants must be reported in compliance with any applicable federal privacy law;
297 (2) prescribe the information that must be included in each report, which must include,
298 without limitation: (A) the name, address, age and ethnicity of the patient; (B) the variant of
15 of 24

299 sickle cell disease with which the person has been diagnosed; (C) the method of treatment; (D)
300 any other diseases from which the patient suffers; (E) information concerning the usage of and
301 access to health care services by the patient; and (F) if a patient diagnosed with sickle cell
302 disease and its variants dies, his or her age at death and cause of death; and
303 (3) establish a protocol for allowing appropriate access to and preserving the
304 confidentiality of the records of patients needed for research into sickle cell disease and its
305 variants;
306 (4) establish a protocol for allowing information, in accordance with the preceding
307 subsections, to be communicated with Statewide Steering Committee on Sickle Cell Disease, the
308 sickle cell disease services program, and within the department as determined appropriate by the
309 commissioner.
310 (c) The chief administrative officer of each health care facility in the commonwealth shall
311 make available to the commissioner or designee the records of the health care facility for each
312 case of sickle cell disease and its variants. The department of public health shall abstract from
313 the records of a health care facility or shall require a health care facility to abstract from its own
314 records such information as is required by regulations promulgated pursuant to subsection (b).
315 The department shall compile the information in a timely manner and not later than 6 months
316 after receipt of the abstracted information from the health care facility. The department shall by
317 regulation adopt a schedule of fees which must be assessed to a health care facility for each case
318 from which information is abstracted by the department. Any person who violates this section is
319 subject to an administrative penalty established by regulation by the department.
16 of 24

320 (d) The department shall publish reports based upon the information obtained pursuant to
321 subsections (a), (b), and (c) and shall make other appropriate uses of the information to report
322 and assess trends in the usage of and access to health care services by patients with sickle cell
323 disease and its variants in a particular area or population, advance research and education
324 concerning sickle cell disease and its variants and improve treatment of sickle cell disease and its
325 variants and associated disorders. The reports must include, without limitation:
326 (1) information concerning the locations in which patients diagnosed with sickle cell
327 disease and its variants reside, the demographics of such patients and the utilization of health
328 care services by such patients;
329 (2) the information described in paragraph (1), specific to patients diagnosed with sickle
330 cell disease and its variants who are over 60 years of age or less than 5 years of age; and
331 (3) information on the transition of patients diagnosed with sickle cell disease and its
332 variants from pediatric to adult care upon reaching 18 years of age.
333 (e) The department shall provide any qualified researcher whom the department
334 determines is conducting valid scientific research with data from the reported information upon
335 the researcher’s: (1) compliance with appropriate conditions as established under the regulations
336 of the department; and (2) payment of a fee established by the department by regulation to cover
337 the cost of providing the data.
338 (f) The commissioner or designee shall analyze the information obtained pursuant to
339 subsections (a), (b) and (c) and the reports published pursuant to subsection (d) to determine
340 whether any trends exist in the usage of and access to health care services by patients with sickle
341 cell disease and its variants in a particular area or population.
17 of 24

342 (g) If the commissioner or designee determines that a trend exists in the usage of and
343 access to health care services by patients with sickle cell disease and its variants in a particular
344 area or population, the commissioner or designee shall work with appropriate governmental,
345 educational and research entities to investigate the trend, advance research in the trend and
346 facilitate the treatment of sickle cell disease and its variants and associated disorders.
347 (h) The department shall not reveal the identity of any patient, physician, or health care
348 facility which is involved in any reporting required by this section unless the patient, physician
349 or health care facility gives prior written consent to such a disclosure. A person or governmental
350 entity that provides information to the department pursuant to this section shall not be held liable
351 in a civil or criminal action for sharing confidential information unless the person or organization
352 has done so in bad faith or with malicious purpose.
353 (i) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall, unless the context clearly
354 requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
355 “Sickle cell disease and its variants”, an inherited disease caused by a mutation in a gene
356 for hemoglobin in which red blood cells have an abnormal crescent shape that causes them to
357 block small blood cells and die sooner than normal.
358 SCD REGISTRY AND REPORTS- DATA COLLECTION ON SCD TRAIT
359 SECTION 6. (a)(1) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, if a
360 newborn screening for hereditary disorders performed pursuant to section 270.006(A)(2)(e) of
361 chapter 105, Code of Massachusetts Regulations detects the presence of sickle cell trait, the
362 laboratory performing the screening shall notify the physician responsible for the newborn’s care
18 of 24

363 and shall document the patient’s information in the central registry established pursuant to
364 paragraph (2) in a manner and on forms prescribed by the department of public health.
365 (2) The physician responsible for such newborn’s care shall provide the patient’s parents
366 with information concerning the availability, benefits, and role of genetic counseling performed
367 by a genetic counselor licensed pursuant to section 253 of chapter 112 of the General Laws,
368 including a document available in multiple languages (as determined by the department) that
369 identifies at least 10 genetic counselors and the public health care payers and private health care
370 payers which contract with each such genetic counselor. In the case a physician described in the
371 preceding sentence is not identified, the laboratory described in paragraph (1) shall provide the
372 patient’s parents with such information relating to genetic counseling. Genetic counseling
373 concerning a diagnosis of sickle cell trait shall include, but not be limited to, information
374 concerning the fact that one or both of the parents carries sickle cell trait and the risk that other
375 children born to the parents may carry sickle cell trait or may be born with sickle cell disease.
376 (b)(1) The commissioner of public health shall establish a central registry of patients
377 diagnosed with sickle cell trait. The information in the central registry shall be used for the
378 purposes of compiling statistical information and assisting the provision of follow-up counseling,
379 intervention, and educational services to patients and to the parents of patients who are listed in
380 the registry including, but not limited to, information concerning the availability and benefits of
381 genetic counseling performed by a genetic counselor licensed pursuant to section 253 of chapter
382 112 of the General Laws.
383 (2) The commissioner shall establish a system to notify the parents of patients who are
384 listed in the registry that follow-up consultations with a physician are recommended for children
19 of 24

385 diagnosed with sickle cell trait. Such notifications shall be provided: at least once when the
386 patient is in early adolescence, when the patient may begin to participate in strenuous athletic
387 activities that could result in adverse symptoms for a person with sickle cell trait; at least once
388 during later adolescence, when the patient should be made aware of the reproductive
389 implications of sickle cell trait; and at such other intervals as the commissioner may require.
390 (3) The commissioner shall establish a system under which the department shall make
391 reasonable efforts to notify patients listed in the registry who reach the age of 18 years of the
392 patient’s inclusion in the registry and of the availability of educational services, genetic
393 counseling, and other resources that may be beneficial to the patient.
394 (4) Information on newborn infants and their families compiled pursuant to this section
395 may be used by the department and agencies designated by the commissioner of public health for
396 the purposes of carrying out this act, but otherwise the information shall not be a public record
397 and shall be confidential and not divulged or made public so as to disclose the identity of any
398 person to whom it relates, except as exempted or consented in accordance with section 10 of
399 chapter 66 or section 70G of chapter 111 of the General Laws, respectively.
400 DEVELOPMENT OF A COMPREHENSIVE SCD DISEASE QUALITY STRATEGY
401 IN MEDICAID MANAGED CARE
402 SECTION 7. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the division
403 of medical assistance shall ensure the availability of accessible, quality health care for
404 individuals with sickle cell disease who are enrolled in Medicaid managed care organizations or
405 accountable care organizations that have a contract with the division to provide services to
20 of 24

406 individuals enrolled under MassHealth pursuant to section 9 of chapter 118E of the General
407 Laws. Such health care shall include, but not be limited to the following:
408 (1) comprehensive integrated care management for sickle cell disease, including primary
409 care, specialized care, and mental health services;
410 (2) sickle cell trait testing and genetic counseling;
411 (3) social work services as well as education on disease management to patients,
412 caregivers, and providers; and
413 (4) support navigating health insurance coverage and support with transportation to
414 treatment centers.
415 (b) Not later than January 1, 2027, the division of medical assistance shall require
416 Medicaid managed care or accountable care organizations to implement a sickle cell disease
417 quality strategy for children and adults with sickle cell disease that includes, but is not limited to,
418 the following components:
419 (1) measurable goals to improve the identification of members with sickle cell disease
420 within 90 days after enrolling in the contracted health plan;
421 (2) to the extent practicable, adequate provider network capacity to ensure timely access
422 to sickle cell disease specialty service providers, including, but not limited to, hematologists;
423 (3) care coordination strategies and supports to help members with sickle cell disease
424 access sickle cell disease specialists and other related care supports;
21 of 24

425 (4) delivery of a training curriculum approved by the division of medical assistance to
426 educate primary care providers on sickle cell disease, including information on emergency
427 warning signs and complications, evidence-based practices and treatment guidelines, and when
428 to make referrals to specialty sickle cell disease treatment providers; and
429 (5) in the case of an individual who is diagnosed with sick cell disease, exceptions to
430 otherwise applicable prior authorization or dispensing limits for pain medications that are
431 designed to reduce barriers for such an individual to be able to obtain the appropriate dosage and
432 amount of a pain medication in a timely manner.
433 (c) The division of medical assistance shall also do the following:
434 (1) Not later than January 1, 2027, require each Medicaid managed care organization and
435 accountable care organization to report, on a quarterly basis, an unduplicated count of children
436 and adults identified as having sickle cell disease enrolled with the contracted plan during the
437 quarter. The department shall publish these reports, by contracted plan, on the department's
438 website.
439 (2) Not later than January 1, 2027, and in partnership with Medicaid managed care
440 organizations and accountable care organizations, identify, document, and share best practices
441 regarding sickle cell disease care management and care coordination with Medicaid-enrolled
442 primary care and sickle cell disease specialty providers with a goal of improving services for
443 members with sickle cell disease and their families.
444 (3) Enter into a contract not later than January 1, 2027, with a publicly funded university
445 to develop a sickle cell disease-focused comprehensive assessment tool or a supplement to an
446 existing comprehensive assessment tool to screen members identified with sickle cell disease for
22 of 24

447 comorbidities, medical history for the treatment of sickle cell disease including disease-
448 modifying medications and pain management, psychosocial history, barriers to accessing or
449 completing treatments, social supports, other care coordinators working with the member,
450 community resources being used or needed, quality of life, and personal preferences for
451 engagement with a care coordinator.
452 (4) Not later than January 1, 2027, establish performance measures relative to access to
453 care and available therapies, engagement in treatment, and outcomes for individuals with sickle
454 cell disease, with the metrics to be reported annually by the comprehensive health care program
455 to Medicaid managed care organizations and accountable care organizations and with incentive
456 payments attached to the measures.
457 (5) Not later than January 1, 2027, develop a plan for improving the transition from
458 pediatric care to adult care for adolescents with sickle cell disease who are aging out of the
459 Medicaid program, and a plan for helping qualified beneficiaries maintain Medicaid coverage
460 under another eligibility category, in order to maintain continuity of care.
461 (d) The division of medical assistance shall provide an annual sickle cell disease
462 management and accountability report to the senate and house committees on ways and means,
463 including the status of sickle cell disease-focused access to care, quality of services, health
464 outcomes, and disparities in the commonwealth.
465 (e) The division of medical assistance shall incorporate the sickle cell disease
466 management and accountability standards into its contracts with managed care plans and
467 accountable care organizations, including financial or administrative penalties for lack of
23 of 24

468 performance. Contracted plan rates must be adjusted to reflect enhanced care or other provisions
469 that are shifted to the contracted plans.
24 of 24